Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.580

Use of substitutes—Adoption of rules.

(1) The building code council shall adopt rules, including by amending existing rules as necessary, that permit the use of substitutes approved under RCW 70A.60.060 and that do not require the use of substitutes that are restricted under RCW 70A.60.060. The building code council may not prohibit the use of a substitute refrigerant allowed pursuant to the United States environmental protection agency's significant new alternatives policy to implement 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7671k.

(2) The building code council shall adopt rules that allow the use of substitutes, as defined in RCW 70A.60.010, with a lower global warming potential than alternative substances, in accordance with nationally recognized, published standards that protect building occupant safety and reduce fire risks.

(3) The building code council may adopt rules that allow the use of substitutes, as defined in RCW 70A.60.010, that are under review but have not yet been approved by the United States environmental protection agency's significant new alternatives policy to implement 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7671k, if the substitutes have a lower global warming potential than alternative substances and meet nationally recognized, published standards that protect building occupant safety and reduce fire risks.

(4) Any rules adopted by the building code council that affect the design or installation of refrigeration or air conditioning systems must be consistent with a goal of minimizing system leakage of refrigerants.

(5) Prior to the adoption of any rules by the building code council that affect the design or installation of refrigeration or air conditioning systems that facilitate the use of substitutes with a low global warming potential in air conditioning systems or equipment, the building code council must solicit input from organizations representing affected parties and parties with expertise in the substitutes or affected types of systems or equipment including, but not limited to:

(a) Manufacturers, distributors, and installers of refrigeration and air conditioning systems; and

(b) Refrigeration and air conditioning system contractors that are small businesses or that primarily serve rural areas.

[ 2021 c 315 s 10; 2021 c 65 s 18; 2019 c 284 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 65 s 18 and by 2021 c 315 s 10, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Finding—Intent—2019 c 284: See note following RCW 70A.60.060.